Washington statutes.
RCW 43.372.060

Authority limited.

No authority is created under this chapter to affect in any way any project, use, or activity in the state's marine waters existing prior to or during the development and review of the marine management plan. No authority is created under this chapter to supersede the current authority of any state agency or local government.

[ 2010 c 145 s 8.]